District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.70

Merger or consolidation — Emergence of surviving or new corporation; cessation of separate existence of corporate parties; rights, privileges, immunities, powers and liabilities; aggregate amount of net assets for payment of dividends.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 208, ch. 269, § 70
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.70.
1981 Ed., § 29-370.
1973 Ed., § 29-927f.